Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.943, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Exemptions. (a) This section does not apply to: (1) a product for which federal law governs the presence of PFAS in the product in a manner that preempts state authority; (2) a product regulated under section 325F.072 or 325F.075; or (3) the sale or resale of a used product. (b) Subdivisions 4 and 5 do not apply to a prosthetic or orthotic device or to any product that is a medical device or drug or that is otherwise used in a medical setting or in medical applications regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration. new text begin (c) An electrical, electronic, or mechanical part or motor incorporated into upholstered furniture or textile furnishing is exempt from prohibitions under subdivision 5 until January 1, 2032. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end